Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 3. Nominations

§ 22-23-301.
Municipal officers.

All candidates for municipal office shall be nominated at the municipal primary election. In order to be eligible, a candidate must be a registered voter and a resident of the municipality and ward which he seeks to represent on the day the petition is filed, and shall not be an employee of the municipality. As used in this section, the term “employee” includes only those persons receiving an hourly wage or salary from a municipality. A person who provides volunteer services to a municipality shall not be considered an “employee” under this section based solely upon coverage under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act or other pension, death or disability program.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-320; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1997, ch. 173, § 1; 2003, ch. 36, § 1.

Worker's Compensation Act. —

See §§ 27-14-101(a), 27-14-102(a)(xxvii).

Constitutionality of candidacy requirements. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-23-301

does not require a person to resign municipal employment in order to run for municipal office; it only requires that a person resign municipal employment prior to holding municipal office. Thus, the statute is not unconstitutional on the grounds that it creates a class of persons who must resign their employment before seeking election to municipal office. Hayes v. City of Sheridan, 2005 WY 10, 105 P.3d 459,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2005).

Candidate's failure to be registered. —

Election of a candidate for town council was properly annulled because: (1) the candidate was not a registered voter at the time he filed his petition for candidacy and thus violated Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-23-301

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-23-302

; and (2) failure to meet this requirement was not a mere irregularity. Smith v. Brito, 2007 WY 191, 173 P.3d 351,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 2007).

§ 22-23-302.
Filing fee; application form.

Not more than ninety-six (96) days and not later than eighty-one (81) days preceding the municipal primary election, each candidate for a municipal office shall pay a nonrefundable filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and sign and file with the municipal clerk an application in substantially the following form:

State of Wyoming County of ss I, , the undersigned, swear or affirm that I was born on , (year), and that I have been a resident of the State of Wyoming since , residing at , and that I am a registered voter of Election District No. , Precinct No. , in Ward No. , in the City of , and the State of Wyoming as of the closing of the municipal clerk's office on the day this application is filed, do hereby petition and request that my name be printed upon the Official Municipal Primary Ballot at the next primary election as a candidate for the office of I hereby declare that if nominated and elected I will qualify for the office. Dated: (Signature of Candidate)

Click to view

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-321; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1977, ch. 186, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1990, ch. 42, § 1; 1993, ch. 146, § 2; 1997, ch. 173, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2001, ch. 116, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2014 amendment,

deleted “(Residence Address)” at the end of the section.

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language, substituted “an application” for “a petition”; in the form paragraph, substituted “this application is filed” for “this petition is filed.”

Candidate's failure to be registered. —

Candidate's failure to be registered to vote at the time of filing her application for nomination was inconsequential and a mere irregularity since shortly thereafter she reregistered and met all criteria during the primary election, the general election, and at the time she assumed the municipal office. Rue v. Carter, 919 P.2d 633,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1996).

Election of a candidate for town council was properly annulled because: (1) the candidate was not a registered voter at the time he filed his petition for candidacy and thus violated Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-23-301

and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-23-302

; and (2) failure to meet this requirement was not a mere irregularity. Smith v. Brito, 2007 WY 191, 173 P.3d 351,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 2007).

Cited

in

Hayes v. City of Sheridan, 2005 WY 10, 105 P.3d 459,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and effect of statutes exacting filing fees from candidates for public office, 89 ALR2d 864.

§ 22-23-303.
Certification of candidates; names on ballots.

Not later than sixty-eight (68) days prior to the primary election, the municipal clerk shall certify to the county clerk the names of all qualified candidates for nomination at the municipal primary election and the office they seek. The number of municipal candidates the voters are entitled to vote for at the primary election is the number of candidates to be elected to municipal offices at the general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-322; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1981, ch. 159, § 1; 1990, ch. 42, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “and shall print the names on the primary election ballot” at the end of the first sentence.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-23-304.
Ballot form.

The county clerk shall prepare the municipal primary ballot as provided in chapter 6 of this title for nonpartisan ballots.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-323; Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§§ 22-23-305 and 22-23-306.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, provided for rotation of names on a ballot and for canvassing of returns and certification of results.

§ 22-23-307.
Candidates nominated; certificate of nomination.

The candidates equal to twice the number to be elected to each office who receive the highest number of votes are nominated to run for the office at the next general election and shall be issued a certificate of nomination by the county clerk. A write-in candidate shall not be nominated and shall not be entitled to have his name printed on the ballot for the next general election unless he received at least three (3) votes.

The chief election officer shall notify a write-in candidate who has been nominated for election within forty-eight (48) hours after the canvassing board meets. Notification may be made by United States postal service, any generally accepted business document delivery method evidenced by receipt of delivery or attempted delivery at the last known address of the write-in candidate or service as provided under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. Failure of the successful write-in candidate to accept the nomination within five (5) days after delivery, attempted delivery or service under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, as computed pursuant to W.S.

22-2-110

, results in the successful write-in candidate not appearing on the general election ballot, and results in a vacancy which can be filled as provided in W.S.

22-23-308

. Each notification provided under this section shall inform the write-in candidate that failure to timely respond will result in forfeiture of nomination.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-326; Laws 2001, ch. 116, § 1; 2011, ch. 38, § 1; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the third sentence, inserted “after delivery, attempted delivery or service under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure”; deleted “of proof of service or attempted delivery” preceding “results in the successful”; and made a related change.

§ 22-23-308.
Vacancies in nomination.

A vacancy in nomination for a municipal office to be filled at a general election occurs if:

A candidate nominated at a primary election declines to accept the nomination, dies, moves his residence from his constituency or becomes disqualified to hold the office for any reason provided by law;

After the primary election there are no nomination applications for the office of mayor or councilman.

A vacancy in nomination shall be filled by the municipal clerk notifying the person who received the next highest number of votes at the municipal primary election as shown on the official county canvass, or, if no other candidate exists, the vacancy in nomination may be filled by the governing body of the municipality.

Not less than sixty (60) days prior to the general election, the municipal clerk shall certify to the county clerk the names of all qualified candidates who have accepted nomination by write-in vote and those nominated by the governing body and the office they seek. The names shall be printed on the general election ballot.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-327; Laws 1981, ch. 159, § 1; 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1990, ch. 42, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Applied

in

Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).